Maryland, session 2026, SB0305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
4–1013.
(a) In this section, “qualifying nonprofit organization” means an organization
that:
(1) provides training and reentry assistance for incarcerated and formerly
incarcerated individuals;
(2) provides training for at least 50 incarcerated or formerly incarcerated
individuals per year in automotive repair;
(3) is able to provide an automotive repair certificate from a nationally
recognized automotive repair organization to eligible participants; and
– 1 –

Ch. 403 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) demonstrates a minimum of a 50% employment placement rate for
eligible participants in a paid automotive repair job.
(b) For fiscal years 2026 through [2028] 2029, each year the Governor may
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 to be used solely as an
operating grant to qualifying nonprofit organizations for the purpose of providing training
to formerly incarcerated individuals in automotive repair.
(c) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention[, Youth,] and [Victim Services]
POLICY shall administer the grant funds to qualifying nonprofit organizations in
accordance with § 4–1008 of this subtitle.
(d) A qualifying nonprofit organization that receives a grant under this section
shall submit for each fiscal year the following to the Executive Director of the Governor’s
Office of Crime Prevention[, Youth,] and [Victim Services] POLICY:
(1) proof of the expenditure of the grant funds and the purposes for which
the funds were expended;
(2) the total number of incarcerated and formerly incarcerated individuals
who received services; and
(3) any related outcome–based performance measures.
Chapter 892 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [4] 5 years and, at the end of [June 30,
2028] JUNE 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –